Utah statutes.
16-16-403.   Change to amendment of organic rules at meeting.

(1)  A substantive change to a proposed amendment of the organic rules may not be made at the members meeting at which a vote on the amendment occurs.

(2)  A nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment of the organic rules may be made at the members meeting at which the vote on the amendment occurs and need not be separately voted upon by the board of directors.

(3)  A vote to adopt a nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment to the organic rules shall be by the same percentage of votes required to pass a proposed amendment.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

